Oklahoma, session 2026, SB708.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 901.25a, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 901.25a. A. When the respective territories of any


city or town and any district are contiguous they may be included in


the limits of the district in the same manner as provided for the


organization of fire protection districts. Such territory shall not


be included or added to the territory of the district without the


consent of the board of directors, certified to the board of county


commissioners. In case any such territory is added to the district


the property therein shall immediately become subject to the lien


for the payment of bonds theretofore authorized by the district in



Req. No. 673 Page 1


the same manner as property within the district at the time of


authorization of such bonds.


B. 1. If the board of directors of two or more fire protection


districts should determine that the citizens they serve would be


equally or better served by the mutual consolidation of the


districts into one district, the board of directors of the


consolidating districts shall develop a plan for consolidation,


including combining board members as provided in Section 901.5 of


this title, determining the millage levy of the proposed district,


and changing ownership of assets and indebtedness. The board of


directors shall present the plan with a resolution for consolidation


to the board of county commissioners of any involved counties for


their approval.


2. Upon the presentation of such petition, the board of county


commissioners shall set a hearing for such petition at a time not


less than twenty (20) days nor more than forty (40) days from the


date of the presentation and shall direct the county clerk to give


notice of such hearing by publication in a newspaper of general


circulation in the county in which such proposed district is


located. Such notice shall be published for two (2) consecutive


weeks preceding the date of such hearing. Such notice shall


describe the boundaries of the proposed district, shall state the


time and place of the hearing, and shall state that any person may



Req. No. 673 Page 2


appear and protest the consolidation of the districts or the


boundaries of the proposed district.


3. The board of county commissioners shall have jurisdiction to


hear and determine all protests to the consolidation of the


districts and all matters pertaining to the same. At the conclusion


of such hearing, the board of county commissioners shall determine


whether the consolidation of such districts would be conducive to


the public safety of the area incorporated within the boundaries of


the proposed district. If the board of county commissioners


determines that such district will be conducive to the public safety


of the area incorporated therein, then the board of county


commissioners shall approve the proposed district.


4. Upon approval of the proposed district, the board of county


commissioners shall give such proposed district a name and shall


call an election of the qualified electors in the territory


comprising such proposed district on the question of whether the


proposed district shall be consolidated. The county clerk shall


cause notice of the election to be given by publication once a week


for two (2) successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation


in the territory comprising the proposed district. Such notice


shall state the time and place of holding the election and set forth


the description of the boundaries of the proposed district, its


general purpose and intention, and the proposed millage levy of such


district. Such notice shall require the electors to cast ballots

Req. No. 673 Page 3


which contain the words: “Consolidated Fire Protection District -


Yes”, and “Consolidated Fire Protection District – No”, or words


equivalent thereto. All persons resident of such proposed district,


who are qualified electors in their respective precincts, shall be


qualified to vote on such proposition.


5. Such elections shall be conducted in accordance with the


general election laws of the state and the regular election


officials shall be in charge at the usual polling place of each


regular precinct, or part of a precinct, which shall include lands


within the boundaries of such proposed district. The returns of


such election shall be made direct to the board of county


commissioners who shall meet on the second Monday following such


election and proceed to canvass the vote cast. If, upon canvass, it


appears that at least three-fifths (3/5) of all the votes cast are


“Consolidated Fire Protection District – Yes”, the board of county


commissioners shall, by order, declare such territory duly organized


as a single fire protection district under the designated name.


Such order shall be filed for record in the office of the county


clerk by the board of county commissioners and from that date such


district shall be complete.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-673 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:41:46 AM



Req. No. 673 Page 4